Utah statutes.
77-9-1.   Authority of peace officer of another state.

A peace officer of another state or the District of Columbia who enters this state in fresh pursuit and continues in fresh pursuit of a person in order to arrest him on the ground that he is reasonably believed to have committed a felony in another state, has the same authority to arrest and hold a person in custody as a peace officer of this state. Fresh pursuit does not require instant action, but pursuit without unreasonable delay.

